District of Columbia statutes.
28-3503

Declaration, grant, and assignment of trust.

A declaration or creation of trust or confidence of real estate which is not in writing, signed by the party who is by law enabled to declare the trust or by his last will in writing, is void.

A grant or assignment of a trust or confidence which is not in writing, signed by the party granting or assigning it, or by his last will, is void.

Where a conveyance is made of real estate by which a trust or confidence is or may arise or result by the implication or construction of law, or is transferred or extinguished by an act or operation of law, the trust or confidence is of the same effect as it would have been if this section had not been enacted.

Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 676, Pub. L. 88-509, § 1
Estates, conveyances, see § 42-301 et seq.
Estates in land, see § 42-501 et seq.
Mortgages and deeds of trust, see § 42-801 et seq.
1981 Ed., § 28-3503.
1973 Ed., § 28-3503.